Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-221
Constitutional convention; primary election; proclamation; notice; returns.

Primary elections shall be proclaimed and notice thereof given by the same persons and in the same manner as provided by law in the case of a regular state primary or general election. Returns thereof shall be made, the results thereof certified, and the elections otherwise conducted as provided by law in case of primary and general elections for the selection of candidates for members to the Legislature, insofar as such laws are applicable, unless otherwise provided for by sections 49-212 to 49-234.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 10, p. 551.